Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.530

Refusing to leave voting booth.

Deliberately impeding other voters from casting their votes by refusing to leave a voting booth or voting device is a misdemeanor and is subject to the penalties provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW. Election officers may provide assistance in the manner provided by RCW 29A.40.160 to any voter who requests it.

[ 2011 c 10 s 71; 2003 c 111 s 2123. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 49. Formerly RCW 29.51.221.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.